Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Disclosure Requirements of Applicants for
Commercial Hazardous or Nonhazardous
Solid Waste Facility Permits

§ 17-17-501.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Applicant” means any person except a public agency applying for a permit to operate and/or construct a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or commercial hazardous waste management facility. If a public agency applies for a permit and proposes to operate a facility by contract, the contractor shall also be required to file a disclosure statement as described in Section 17-17-503 and the permit board shall evaluate such statement as described in Section 17-17-505.

“Business concern” means any corporation, association, firm, partnership, trust, joint venture or other form of commercial organization.

“Key employee” means any person employed by an applicant in a management capacity and empowered to make operational or financial management decisions with respect to solid waste or hazardous waste management operations of the business concern as determined by the commission, but shall not include employees primarily engaged in the physical or mechanical treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid or hazardous waste.

“Public agency” means any incorporated city or town, county, political subdivision, governmental district or unit, public corporation, public institution of higher learning, community college district, planning and development district or governmental agency created under the laws of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 583, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-503.
Filing of disclosure statements by applicants for issuance, reissuance or transfer of permits pertaining to waste management facilities; contents; updating of statements.

Every applicant for issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid waste at a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or hazardous waste at a commercial hazardous waste management facility shall file with the permit board at the time the application is filed a disclosure statement. The disclosure statement shall be sworn to or affirmed and subscribed and dated by the applicant. The disclosure statement shall be filed on forms supplied by the department and shall contain the following information:

If the applicant is an individual, the full name, business address, date of birth and Social Security number of the applicant; or

If the applicant is a business concern, the full name, business address, date of establishment, and federal employer identification number of the business concern, and the full names, business addresses, dates of birth and Social Security numbers of any officers, directors, partners or key employees thereof and all persons or business concerns holding equity in that business concern, or if the business concern is a publicly traded corporation, an individual holding more than five percent (5%), individuals related within third degree holding a cumulative of five percent (5%) or more or business concerns holding more than five percent (5%) of the equity in that business concern, except where the equity is held by an investment company which is publicly traded or a chartered lending institution, in which case the applicant need only supply the name and business address of the investment company or lending institution;

The full names, business addresses, dates of birth and Social Security numbers of all officers, directors or partners of any business concern disclosed in the statement and the name and addresses of all persons holding any equity in any business concern so disclosed, if the business concern is a publicly traded corporation, an individual holding more than five percent (5%), individuals related within third degree holding a cumulative of five percent (5%) or more or business concerns holding more than five percent (5%) of the equity in that business concern, except where the equity is held by an investment company which is publicly traded or a chartered lending institution, in which case the applicant need only supply the name and business address of the investment company which is publicly traded or lending institution;

A listing of all persons or business concerns holding debt liability in a non-publicly traded applicant business concern. If the applicant business concern is publicly traded, a listing of all individuals or business concerns holding more than five percent (5%), or individuals related within the third degree holding a cumulative of five percent (5%) or more debt liability in the applicant business concern. In accordance with the debt liability disclosure requirements for applicants, any business concern disclosed pursuant to paragraph (b) shall provide a listing of debt liability holders. The listing of debt liability holders shall include for each person or business concern the full name, business address, federal employer identification number, amount of debt liability held in U.S. dollars and the percentage of the total debt liability held. For the purposes of this section, individuals and business concerns disclosed pursuant to this paragraph are not subject to further disclosure requirements and shall not be considered a “disclosed business concern” unless expressly requested by the permit board.

The full name and business address of any company which collects, transports, treats, processes, stores or disposes of solid or hazardous waste in which the applicant holds an equity interest of five percent (5%) or more;

A description of the business experience and credentials, including any past or present permits or licenses for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid or hazardous waste possessed by the applicant, or if the applicant is a business concern, by the key employees, officers, directors or partners thereof;

A listing and explanation of any notices of violation, prosecutions, administrative orders (whether by consent or otherwise) or license or permit suspensions or revocations, or enforcement actions of any sort by any state or federal authority within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application, which are pending or have concluded in a finding of violation or entry of a consent agreement regarding any allegation of civil or criminal violation of any law, regulation or requirement related to the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid or hazardous waste by any person required to be disclosed in the statement and an itemized list by any person required to be disclosed in the statement of all final convictions of and pleas of guilty or nolo contendere to any crime punishable as a felony in any jurisdiction within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit;

A listing of any agencies outside of Mississippi which had regulatory responsibility over the applicant in connection with its treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid or hazardous waste; and

Any other information the permit board may require related to the disclosure statement as described above or the evaluation of such statement as described in Section 17-17-505.

The disclosure statement shall be updated as required by the permit board, but not more frequently than annually.

The provisions of subsections (6) and (7) of Section 17-17-27 shall be applicable to information submitted by the applicant to the permit board under this section.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to applicants for permits involving the storage, treatment, processing or disposal of nonhazardous solid waste only.

The Commission on Environmental Quality may waive the filing of disclosure information required by this section if the information regards the holder of less than five percent (5%) of the equity of the applicant or the holder of less than five percent (5%) of the equity in any business concern which holds equity in the applicant.

In order to apply for the waiver, the applicant shall file a sworn petition requesting such waiver and allege either (i) that the information cannot be ascertained after reasonable and diligent search and inquiry, setting forth in the petition the facts and circumstances alleged to constitute the reasonable and diligent search and inquiry to obtain the information or (ii) the information required is not relevant or material, setting forth in the petition the facts and circumstances in support of the irrelevancy or immateriality of the information.

The commission may waive the filing of such information if the commission finds and declares such information either (i) to be unobtainable after reasonable and diligent search and inquiry or (ii) to be irrelevant or immaterial to the review of the application and (iii) unnecessary to the discharge of its responsibilities with regard to such permit as set forth by law.

Any applicant, other person or interested party aggrieved by an order of the commission waiving the filing of such information may appeal the decision of the commission in the manner provided in Section 49-17-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 583, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 11; Laws, 1994, ch. 540, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1994).

§ 17-17-505.
Grounds for refusal of issuance, reissuance or transfer of permits pertaining to waste management facilities; factors considered where applicants have engaged in unlawful activities.

The permit board may refuse to issue, reissue or transfer a permit for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid waste at a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or hazardous waste at a commercial hazardous waste management facility if the permit board finds that the applicant or any person required to be listed in the disclosure statement:

Has misrepresented or concealed any material fact in the disclosure statement;

Has obtained a permit from the permit board by misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact;

Has been convicted of a felony or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a felony involving any federal or state laws, including environmental laws, within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit;

Has habitually violated any provisions of federal or state environmental laws, rules or regulations related to the management of solid or hazardous waste within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit;

Has been adjudicated in contempt of an order of any court enforcing any state or federal environmental laws within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit;

Has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to bribery or attempting to bribe a public officer or employee of the federal government, or any state or local government in the United States, in the public officer’s or employee’s official capacity within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit; or

Has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to collusion among bidders or prospective bidders in restraint of freedom of competition by agreement to bid a fixed price within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit.

In determining whether to issue, reissue or transfer a permit for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid waste at a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or hazardous waste at a commercial hazardous waste management facility, the permit board shall consider the facts and any mitigating factors including:

The relevance of the offense to the business for which a permit is sought or the nature and responsibilities of the position which a convicted individual would hold;

The nature and seriousness of the offense;

The circumstances under which the offense occurred;

The date of the offense;

The ownership and management structure in place at the time of the offense.

The permit board shall allow the applicant to submit evidence of rehabilitation and shall consider the applicant’s efforts to prevent recurrence of unlawful activity in its determination under subsection (2) of this section. Items to be considered by the permit board shall include:

The applicant’s record and history of implementing successful corrective actions undertaken to prevent or minimize the likelihood of recurrence of the offense;

Whether the offense was an isolated or repeated incident;

Whether the applicant cooperated with governmental bodies during investigations or voluntarily provided information regarding any offense under consideration;

The number and types of permits held by the applicant, and the experience of the applicant in conducting its business;

Implementation by the applicant of formal policies, training programs, or management controls to substantially minimize or prevent the occurrence of future violations or unlawful activities;

Implementation by the applicant of an environmental compliance auditing program to assess and monitor compliance with environmental laws, rules, regulations and permit conditions; and

The applicant’s discharge of individuals or severance of the interest of or affiliation with responsible parties, who would otherwise cause the permit board to deny a permit.

If the permit board finds pursuant to this section that mitigating factors exist or that the applicant has demonstrated rehabilitation, the permit board may issue, reissue or transfer the permit for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid waste at a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or hazardous waste at a commercial hazardous waste management facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 583, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-507.
Consideration of performance history of public agencies applying for permits.

If a public agency applies for a permit, the permit board shall consider the performance history of the public agency as prescribed by Section 17-17-27. The provisions of Sections 17-17-501 through 17-17-507 shall be supplemental and in addition to Section 17-17-27, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 583, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).